Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-146
Fees; refusal to pay; when justified.

It shall be lawful for any person to refuse payment of fees to any officer who will not make out a fee bill signed by him if required, and also a receipt or discharge signed by him for fees paid.

R.S.1866, c. 19, § 28, p. 171;

R.S.1913, § 2471;

C.S.1922, § 2413;

C.S.1929, § 33-151;

R.S.1943, § 33-146.

Under this section the furnishing of an itemized bill of fees to the party for whom the services were rendered is a condition precedent to bringing suit to recover the fees if such a bill has been requested and the right to it has not been waived. Van Etten v. Selden, 36 Neb. 209, 54 N.W. 261 (1893).